Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 72.01.370 and 1992 c 7 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:The superintendent of any state correctional facility may, subject to the approval of the secretary and under RCW 72.01.375, grant escorted leaves of absence to ((inmates))incarcerated individuals confined in such institutions to:(1) ((Go))Attend the funeral or go to the bedside of a seriously ill immediate family member, including the ((inmate's wife, husband, child, mother or father, or other member of the inmate's immediate family who is seriously ill;(2) Attend the funeral of a member of the inmate's immediate family listed in subsection (1) of this section))incarcerated individual's children, stepchildren, grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents, great grandparents, siblings, aunts, uncles, and a person legally married to or in a state registered domestic partnership with an incarcerated individual. "Immediate family" includes the immediate family of an incarcerated individual who was adopted as a child or an adult, but does not include an incarcerated individual adopted by another incarcerated individual or the immediate family of the adopted or adopting individual;(((3)))(2) Participate in athletic contests;(((4)))(3) Perform work in connection with the industrial, educational, or agricultural programs of the department;(((5)))(4) Receive necessary medical or dental care which is not available in the institution; ((and(6)))(5) Participate as a volunteer in community service work projects which are approved by the superintendent, but only ((inmates))incarcerated individuals who are nonviolent offenders may participate in these projects. Such community service work projects shall only be instigated at the request of a local community; and(6) Participate in reentry programs to receive mentorship and prepare incarcerated individuals for a successful reentry.Sec. 2. RCW 72.01.380 and 2012 c 117 s 453 are each amended to read as follows:The secretary is authorized to make rules and regulations providing for the conditions under which ((inmates))incarcerated individuals will be granted leaves of absence, and providing for safeguards to prevent escapes while on leave of absence: PROVIDED, That leaves of absence granted to ((inmates))incarcerated individuals under RCW 72.01.370 shall not allow or permit any ((inmate))incarcerated individual to go beyond the boundaries of this state. The secretary shall also make rules and regulations requiring the reimbursement of the state from the ((inmate))incarcerated individual granted leave of absence, or his or her family, for the actual costs incurred arising from any leave of absence granted under the authority of RCW 72.01.370((, subsections)) (1) ((and (2))): PROVIDED FURTHER, That no state funds shall be expended in connection with leaves of absence granted under RCW 72.01.370((, subsections)) (1) ((and (2))), unless such ((inmate))incarcerated individual and his or her immediate family are indigent and without resources sufficient to reimburse the state for the expenses of such leaves of absence. The state retains full liability for any act constituting gross negligence committed by the department of corrections during an escorted leave of absence.--- END ---